Utah statutes.
73-26-202.   Limits on amount of water available to any entity -- Exception.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), the total amount of water from projects authorized under this chapter that may be made available to any entity or area is limited as follows:

(a)  The Salt Lake County Water Conservancy District and Weber Basin Water Conservancy District each may purchase or lease no more than 50,000 acre-feet a year.

(b)  The Bear River Water Conservancy District may purchase or lease no more than 60,000 acre-feet a year.

(c)  The total cumulative amount of developed waters purchased or leased by Cache County and any water conservancy district in Cache County may not exceed 60,000 acre-feet a year.

(2)  An entity or area may purchase or lease water in excess of the limits specified in Subsection (1) on a temporary basis, if water is available from a project and no other entity eligible to receive water has offered to purchase or lease it.



Amended by Chapter 84, 2006 General Session

